test/src/morphology/A-suuri_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - suuri: # adjectives 'big / suuri' - full paradigm
     suuri+A+Sg+Nom: suuri
     suuri+A+Sg+Gen: suuren
     suuri+A+Sg+Acc: [suuri, suuren]
     suuri+A+Sg+Par: suurdu
     suuri+A+Sg+Tra: suurekse
     suuri+A+Sg+Abe: [suuretta, suureta, suurettah]
     suuri+A+Sg+Com: suurenke
     suuri+A+Sg+Ine: suures
     suuri+A+Sg+Ela: [suurespäi, suures]
     suuri+A+Sg+Ill: suureh
     suuri+A+Sg+Ade: suurel
     suuri+A+Sg+Abl: [suurelpäi, suurel]
     suuri+A+Sg+All: suurele
     suuri+A+Sg+Ess: suurennu
     suuri+A+Sg+Ter: suuressah
     suuri+A+Sg+Apr: suurelluo
     suuri+A+Pl+Nom: suuret
     suuri+A+Pl+Gen: [suurien, suuriloin]
     suuri+A+Pl+Acc: suuret
     suuri+A+Pl+Par: [suurii, suuriloi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Tra: [suurikse, suuriloikse]
     suuri+A+Pl+Abe: [suuritta, suurita, suurittah, suuriloitta, suuriloita, suuriloittah]
     suuri+A+Pl+Com: [suurienke, suuriloinke]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ine: [suuris, suurilois]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ela: [suurispäi, suuris, suuriloispäi, suurilois]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ill: [suurihe, suuriloihe]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ade: [suuril, suuriloil]
     suuri+A+Pl+Abl: [suurilpäi, suuril, suuriloilpäi, suuriloil]
     suuri+A+Pl+All: [suurile, suuriloile]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ess: [suurinnu, suuriloinnu]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ins: [suurin, suuriloin]
     suuri+A+Pl+Apr: [suurilluo, suuriloilluo]
     suuri+A+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: suurigi
     suuri+A+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: suurengi
     suuri+A+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [suurigi, suurengi]
     suuri+A+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: suurdugi
     suuri+A+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: suureksegi
     suuri+A+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [suurettagi, suuretagi, suurettahgi]
     suuri+A+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: suurenkegi
     suuri+A+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: suuresgi
     suuri+A+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [suurespäigi, suuresgi]
     suuri+A+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: suurehgi
     suuri+A+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: suurelgi
     suuri+A+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [suurelpäigi, suurelgi]
     suuri+A+Sg+All+Clt/gi: suurelegi
     suuri+A+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: suurennugi
     suuri+A+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: suuressahgi
     suuri+A+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: suurelluogi
     suuri+A+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: suuretgi
     suuri+A+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: [suuriengi, suuriloingi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: suuretgi
     suuri+A+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: [suuriigi, suuriloigi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: [suuriksegi, suuriloiksegi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [suurittagi, suuritagi, suurittahgi, suuriloittagi, suuriloitagi, suuriloittahgi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: [suurienkegi, suuriloinkegi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: [suurisgi, suuriloisgi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [suurispäigi, suurisgi, suuriloispäigi, suuriloisgi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: [suurihegi, suuriloihegi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: [suurilgi, suuriloilgi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [[suurilpäigi, suurilgi, suuriloilpäigi, suuriloilgi]
     suuri+A+Pl+All+Clt/gi: [suurilegi, suuriloilegi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: [suurinnugi, suuriloinnugi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: [suuringi, suuriloingi]
     suuri+A+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: [suurilluogi, suuriloilluogi]
